src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-xadasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Verb - хадась: # Verb 'to kill / tappaa' - full paradigm - Type 1, transitive
 #_[5-A-tr]_xada-_ʼtappaaʼ_TV_=_Bi-syll_a-vartalo_[MDTN-koodit_a,_ya]
     хадась+V+TV+Ger: [хада, хадась]
     хадась+V+TV+GerFin: хадаванзь
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+Abs: хадава
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+Abs: хадавамʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+Abs: хадаваʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+Abs: хадаванʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+Abs: хадавахана
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+Abs: хадавахад
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+Abs: хадававна
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+Abs: хадавахаʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+Abs: хадавахаʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+Abs: хадавахаʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+Abs: хадаваˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+Abs: хадаби
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+Abs: хадабиˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+Abs: хадавахаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+Abs: хадавахаˮна
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+Abs: хадавахат
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+Abs: хадабиˮмна
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [хадавав, хадавами]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [хадавав, хадавами]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [хадаван, хадавани]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [хадавахан, хадавахани]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [хадаваханан, хадаваханани]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [хадавахадан, хадавахадани]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [хадававнан, хадававнани]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [хадавахаюн, хадавахаюни]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [хадавахаюн, хадавахаюни]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [хадавахаюн, хадавахаюни]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [хадабин, хадабини]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [хадабин,хадабини]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [хадабиˮн, хадабиˮни]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [хадавахаˮн, хадавахаˮни]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [хадавахаˮнан, хадавахаˮнани]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [хадавахатан, хадавахатани]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [хадабиˮмнан, хадабиˮмнани]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: хадавар
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: хадавамд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: хадаванд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: хадаваханд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: хадавахананд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: хадавахаданд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: хадававнанд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg2: хадавахаюд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg2: хадавахаюд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg2: хадавахают
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: хадабид
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: хадабид
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: хадабит
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: хадавахат
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: хадавахаˮнат
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: хадавахатат
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: хадабиˮмнат
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: хадавада
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: хадавамда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: хадаванда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: хадаваханда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: хадавахананда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: хадавахаданда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: хадававнанда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg3: хадавахаюда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg3: хадавахаюда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg3: хадавахаюта
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: хадабида
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: хадабида
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: хадабита
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: хадавахата
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: хадавахаˮната
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: хадавахатата
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: хадабиˮмната
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: хадавамиʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: хадавами
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: хадавамиʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: хадавами
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: хадаваниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: хадавани
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: хадаваханиʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: хадавахани
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: хадавахананиʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: хадаваханани
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: хадавахаданиʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: хадавахадани
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: хадававнаниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: хадававнани
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu1: хадавахаюниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: хадавахаюни
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu1: хадавахаюниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: хадавахаюни
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu1: хадавахаюниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: хадавахаюни
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: хадабиниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: хадабини
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: хадабиниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: хадабини
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: хадабиˮниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: хадабиˮни
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: хадавахаˮниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: хадавахаˮни
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: хадавахаˮнаниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: хадавахаˮнани
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: хадавахатаниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: хадавахатани
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: хадабиˮмнаниʼ
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: хадабиˮмнани
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: хадавариʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: хадавамдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: хадавандиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: хадавахандиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: хадаваханандиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: хадавахадандиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: хадававнандиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu2: хадавахаюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu2: хадавахаюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu2: хадавахаютиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: хадабидиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: хадабидиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: хадабитиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: хадавахатиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: хадавахаˮнатиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: хадавахататиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: хадабиˮмнатиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: хадавадиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: хадавамдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: хадавандиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: хадавахандиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: хадаваханандиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: хадавахадандиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: хадававнандиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu3: хадавахаюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu3: хадавахаюдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu3: хадавахаютиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: хадабидиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: хадабидиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: хадабитиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: хадавахатиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: хадавахаˮнатиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: хадавахататиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: хадабиˮмнатиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: хадававаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: хадававаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: хадаванаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: хадаваханаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: хадавахананаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: хадавахаданаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: хадававнанаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl1: хадавахаюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl1: хадавахаюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl1: хадавахаюнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: хадабинаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: хадабинаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: хадабиˮнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: хадавахаˮнаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: хадавахаˮнанаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: хадавахатанаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: хадабиˮмнанаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: хадавараˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: хадавамдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: хадавандаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: хадавахандаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: хадаваханандаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: хадавахадандаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: хадававнандаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl2: хадавахаюдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl2: хадавахаюдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl2: хадавахаютаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: хадабидаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: хадабидаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: хадабитаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: хадавахатаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: хадавахаˮнатаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: хадавахататаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: хадабиˮмнатаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: хадавадоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: хадавамдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: хадавандоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: хадавахандоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: хадаваханандоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: хадавахадандоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: хадававнандоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl3: хадавахаюдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl3: хадавахаюдоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl3: хадавахаютоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: хадабидоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: хадабидоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: хадабитоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: хадавахатоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: хадавахаˮнатоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: хадавахататоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: хадабиˮмнатоʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Abs: хадавад
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [хадавадав, хадавадув, хадавадами, хадавадми]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [хадавадав, хадавадув, хадавадами, хадавадми]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [хадавадан, хадавадани, хадавадни]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: хадавадар
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: хадавадамд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: хадаваданд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [хадавадада, хадавадда]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: хадавадамда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: хадаваданда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [хадавадамиʼ, хадавадмиʼ]
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [хадавадами, хадавадми]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [хадавадамиʼ, хадавадмиʼ]
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [хадавадами, хадавадми]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [хадаваданиʼ, хадавадниʼ]
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [хадавадани, хадавадни]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [хадавадариʼ, хадавадриʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: хадавадамдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: хадавадандиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [хадавададиʼ, хадаваддиʼ]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: хадавадамдиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: хадавадандиʼ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [хадавадаваˮ, хадавадваˮ]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [хадавадаваˮ, хадавадваˮ]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [хадаваданаˮ, хадаваднаˮ]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [хадавадараˮ, хадавадраˮ]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: хадавадамдаˮ
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: хадавадандаˮ
